Louisiana, session 2026, HB115.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 33:381(C)(38) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§381. Municipal officers
* * *
C.
* * *
(38)(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the board
of aldermen of the village of Edgefield may, upon recommendation of the mayor,
abolish the office of chief of police of the village. No such action by the board shall
be effective until the end of the term of the police chief in office at the time of that
action or when a vacancy occurs in the office, whichever occurs first; however, if at
the time of that action the office is filled by an officer temporarily appointed, the
abolition of the office shall become effective as provided by ordinance.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 115 ENROLLED
(b) If the office of chief of police is abolished and the municipal police
department is abolished pursuant to R.S. 33:362(C), the mayor and board of
aldermen may contract with or enter into a cooperative endeavor agreement with any
law enforcement entity or officer within Red River Parish for police services for the
village.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.